es: Contenido del juego de fundas para asientos: 1 funda de asiento (individual); 2 fundas para asientos delanteros; Incluye fundas para reposabrazos; Incluye funda para la consola; Juego completo (delantero y trasero); Incluye fundas para reposacabezas; Funda para asiento tipo banco trasero (1 pieza); Funda para asiento tipo banco trasero (varias piezas); Solo respaldo del asiento; Solo base del asiento; Otro
ro-RO: Conținut al setului de huse auto: 1 husă de scaun (simplă); 2 huse pentru scaunele din față; Huse pentru cotiere incluse; Husă pentru consolă inclusă; Set complet (față + spate); Huse pentru tetiere incluse; Husă pentru bancheta din spate (1 piesă); Husă pentru bancheta din spate (mai multe piese); Doar spătar; Doar șezut; Altele
en: Seat cover set contents: 1 seat cover (single); 2 front seat covers; Armrest covers included; Console cover included; Full set (front + rear); Headrest covers included; Rear bench cover (1 piece); Rear bench cover (multi-piece); Seat back only; Seat bottom only; Other
lt-LT: Sėdynės užvalkalų rinkinio turinys: 1 sėdynės užvalkalas (vienas); 2 priekinių sėdynių užvalkalai; Porankių užvalkalai pridedami; Konsolės užvalkalas pridedamas; Pilnas komplektas (priekis + galas); Galvos atramų užvalkalai pridedami; Galinio suolo užvalkalas (1 vnt.); Galinio suolo užvalkalas (kelių dalių); Tik sėdynės atlošas; Tik sėdynės apačia; Kita
zh-TW: 座椅套組內容: 1 個椅套 (單個); 2 個前座椅套; 含扶手套; 含中控台套; 整套 (前座 + 後座); 含頭枕套; 後排長型椅套 (1 件式); 後排長型椅套 (多件式); 僅椅背; 僅椅座墊; 其他
pt-PT: Conteúdo do conjunto de capas para o assento: 1 capa de assento (individual); 2 capas de assentos dianteiros; Capas de apoios de braços incluídas; Capa de consola incluída; Conjunto completo (dianteiro + traseiro); Capas de apoios de cabeça incluídas; Capa de banco traseiro (1 peça); Capa de banco traseiro (várias peças); Apenas encosto; Apenas assento; Outro
hu: Üléshuzat-szett tartalma: 1 üléshuzat (szimpla); 2 első üléshuzat; Kartámaszhuzatokat tartalmaz; Konzolhuzatot tartalmaz; Teljes készlet (első + hátsó); Fejtámlahuzatokat tartalmaz; Hátsó padhuzat (1 darab); Hátsó padhuzat (többrészes); Csak háttámla; Csak ülőlap; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vsebina kompleta prevlek za sedeže: 1 prevleka za sedež (enojna); 2 prevleki za sprednja sedeža; Vključene prevleke za naslon za roke; Vključena prevleka za konzolo; Celoten komplet (spredaj in zadaj); Vključene prevleke za naslone za glavo; Prevleka za zadnjo klop (1 kos); Prevleka za zadnjo klop (večdelna); Samo naslonjalo sedeža; Samo sedalni del sedeža; Drugo
de: Inhalt des Sitzbezug-Sets: 1 Sitzbezug (einzeln); 2 Vordersitzbezüge; Armlehnenbezüge inbegriffen; Konsolenbezug inbegriffen; Komplettset (vorne + hinten); Kopfstützenbezüge inbegriffen; Rückbankbezug (1-teilig); Rückbankbezug (mehrteilig); Nur Sitzlehne; Nur Sitzfläche; Sonstige
da: Sædebetræksættets indhold: 1 sædebetræk (enkelt); 2 forsædebetræk; Betræk til armlæn medfølger; Betræk til konsol medfølger; Fuldt sæt (for og bag); Betræk til nakkestøtter medfølger; Betræk til bagbænk (1 styk); Betræk til bagbænk (flere stykker); Kun ryglæn; Kun sædebund; Andet
pl: Zawartość zestawu pokrowców na siedzenia: 1 pokrowiec na fotel (pojedynczy); 2 pokrowce na przednie fotele; Pokrowce na podłokietniki w zestawie; Pokrowiec na konsolę w zestawie; Pełny zestaw (przód + tył); Pokrowce na zagłówki w zestawie; Pokrowiec na tylną kanapę (1-częściowy); Pokrowiec na tylną kanapę (wieloczęściowy); Tylko oparcie fotela; Tylko siedzisko fotela; Inne
tr: Koltuk kılıfı seti içeriği: 1 koltuk kılıfı (tekli); 2 ön koltuk kılıfı; Kol dayama kılıfları dahildir; Konsol kılıfı dahildir; Tam set (ön ve arka); Başlık kılıfları dahildir; Arka düz koltuk kılıfı (1 parça); Arka düz koltuk kılıfı (çok parçalı); Yalnızca koltuk sırtlığı; Yalnızca koltuk minderi; Diğer
nl: Stoelhoes set inhoud: 1 stoelhoes (enkel); 2 voorstoelhoezen; Armleuninghoezen inbegrepen; Consolehoes inbegrepen; Volledige set (voor + achter); Hoofdsteunhoezen inbegrepen; Hoes voor achterbank (1-delig); Hoes voor achterbank (meerdelig); Alleen rugleuning; Alleen zitting; Overig
bg-BG: Съдържание на комплекта калъфи за седалки: 1 калъф за седалка (единичен); 2 калъфа за предни седалки; Включени калъфи за подлакътници; Включен калъф за конзолата; Пълен комплект (предни + задни); Включени калъфи за подглавници; Калъф за задна седалка тип пейка (1 част); Калъф за задна седалка тип пейка (многокомпонентен); Само за облегалката; Само за долната част на седалката; Други
ru: Содержимое комплекта чехлов сиденья: 1 чехол для сиденья (одиночный); 2 чехла для передних сидений; Чехлы для подлокотников в комплекте; Чехол для консоли в комплекте; Полный комплект (передние + задние); Чехлы для подголовников в комплекте; Чехол на заднее сиденье (цельный); Чехол на заднее сиденье (из нескольких деталей); Только спинка сиденья; Только подушка сиденья; Другое
nb: Innhold i setetrekksett: 1 setetrekk (enkelt); 2 setetrekk foran; Armlenetrekk inkludert; Konsolltrekk inkludert; Komplett sett (foran og bak); Nakkestøttetrekk inkludert; Trekk til baksetebenk (1 del); Trekk til baksetebenk (flere deler); Kun seterygg; Kun setepute; Annet
sv: Sätesöverdrag – innehåll: 1 sätesöverdrag (enkelt); 2 sätesöverdrag fram; Armstödsöverdrag ingår; Konsolöverdrag ingår; Helt set (fram + bak); Nackstödsöverdrag ingår; Baksätesöverdrag (1 del); Baksätesöverdrag (flera delar); Endast ryggstöd; Endast sits; Övrigt
pt-BR: Se vários métodos forem usados, selecione o principal.: 1 capa de banco (individual); 2 capas para bancos dianteiros; Capas para apoio de braço incluídas; Capa de console incluída; Conjunto completo (dianteiro + traseiro); Capas para encosto de cabeça incluídas; Capa para banco traseiro (1 peça); Capa para banco traseiro (múltiplas peças); Apenas encosto; Apenas assento inferior; Outros
sk-SK: Obsah súpravy poťahov sedadiel: 1 poťah na sedadlo (samostatný); 2 poťahy na predné sedadlá; Vrátane poťahov na opierky rúk; Vrátane poťahu na konzolu; Kompletná súprava (predné a zadné); Vrátane poťahov na opierky hlavy; Poťah na zadnú lavicu (1 kus); Poťah na zadnú lavicu (viacdielny); Len operadlo; Len sedák; Iné
cs: Obsah sady potahů sedadel: 1 potah na sedadlo (samostatný); 2 potahy na přední sedadla; Včetně potahů na loketní opěrky; Včetně potahu na středovou konzolu; Kompletní sada (přední a zadní); Včetně potahů na hlavové opěrky; Potah na zadní lavici (1 kus); Potah na zadní lavici (vícedílný); Pouze opěradlo; Pouze sedák; Jiné
ja: シートカバーセット内容: シートカバー 1枚 (シングル); フロントシートカバー 2枚; アームレストカバー付き; コンソールカバー付き; フルセット (フロント + リア); ヘッドレストカバー付き; リアベンチカバー (1ピース); リアベンチカバー (マルチピース); シートバックのみ; シートボトムのみ; その他
el: Περιεχόμενα σετ καλύμματος καθισμάτων: 1 κάλυμμα καθίσματος (μονό); 2 καλύμματα μπροστινών καθισμάτων; Περιλαμβάνονται καλύμματα υποβραχιόνιου; Περιλαμβάνεται κάλυμμα κονσόλας; Πλήρες σετ (μπροστά + πίσω); Περιλαμβάνονται καλύμματα προσκέφαλου; Κάλυμμα πίσω καθίσματος (1 τεμάχιο); Κάλυμμα πίσω καθίσματος (πολλαπλών τεμαχίων); Μόνο πλάτη καθίσματος; Μόνο βάση καθίσματος; Άλλο
fi: Istuinsuojapakkauksen sisältö: 1 istuinsuoja (yksittäinen); 2 etuistuimen suojaa; Sisältää käsinojien suojat; Sisältää konsolin suojan; Koko sarja (etu ja taka); Sisältää niskatukien suojat; Takapenkin suoja (1-osainen); Takapenkin suoja (moniosainen); Vain selkänoja; Vain istuinosa; Muu
zh-CN: 座套套装包含的产品: 1 件座椅套（单座）; 2 件前排座椅套; 包含扶手套; 包含控制台盖; 全套（前排 + 后排）; 包含头枕套; 后排长条座椅套（1 件）; 后排长条座椅套（多件）; 仅座椅靠背; 仅座椅座垫; 其他
ko: 시트 커버 세트 구성품: 1인용 시트 커버(싱글); 전면 시트 커버 2개; 팔걸이 커버 포함; 콘솔 커버 포함; 풀 세트(전면 + 후면); 머리 받침대 커버 포함; 후면 벤치 커버(1피스); 후면 벤치 커버(다중 피스); 시트 등받이 전용; 시트 바닥 전용; 기타
vi: Thành phần bộ bọc ghế bao gồm: 1 bọc ghế (đơn); 2 bọc ghế trước; Có kèm bọc tựa tay; Có kèm bọc bảng điều khiển giữa; Trọn bộ (trước + sau); Có kèm bọc tựa đầu; Bọc băng ghế sau (1 mảnh); Bọc băng ghế sau (nhiều mảnh); Chỉ lưng ghế; Chỉ mặt ghế; Khác
fr: Contenu de l’ensemble de housses de siège: 1 housse de siège (simple); 2 housses de siège avant; Housses d'accoudoir incluses; Housse de console incluse; Jeu complet (avant + arrière); Housses d'appui-tête incluses; Housse de banquette arrière (1 pièce); Housse de banquette arrière (plusieurs pièces); Dossier de siège uniquement; Assise de siège uniquement; Autre
th: เนื้อหาชุดหุ้มเบาะ: ที่หุ้มเบาะ 1 ผืน (เดี่ยว); ที่หุ้มเบาะหน้า 2 ผืน; รวมที่หุ้มที่วางแขน; รวมที่หุ้มคอนโซล; ครบชุด (หน้า + หลัง); รวมที่หุ้มพนักพิงศีรษะ; ที่หุ้มเบาะนั่งยาวด้านหลัง (1 ชิ้น); ที่หุ้มเบาะนั่งยาวด้านหลัง (หลายชิ้น); พนักพิงเบาะเท่านั้น; ส่วนรองนั่งเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Sadržaj seta navlaka za sjedalo: 1 navlaka za sjedalo (pojedinačna); 2 navlake za prednja sjedala; Uključene navlake za naslone za ruke; Uključena navlaka za konzolu; Puni set (prednje + stražnje); Uključene navlake za naslone za glavu; Navlaka za stražnju klupu (1 komad); Navlaka za stražnju klupu (iz više komada); Samo naslon sjedala; Samo dno sjedala; Ostalo
it: Contenuto del set di coprisedili: 1 coprisedile (singolo); 2 coprisedili anteriori; Copribraccioli inclusi; Copriconsole incluso; Set completo (anteriore + posteriore); Copripoggiatesta inclusi; Copertura panca posteriore (1 pezzo); Copertura panca posteriore (più pezzi); Solo schienale; Solo fondo del sedile; Altro